Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.040

Consent not required—Notice.

Notwithstanding RCW 9.73.030 and 9.73.090, a law enforcement officer conducting a custodial interrogation is not required to obtain consent to electronic recording from the individual being interrogated, but must inform the individual that an electronic recording is being made of the interrogation. This chapter does not permit a law enforcement officer or a law enforcement agency to record a private communication between an individual and the individual's lawyer.

[ 2021 c 329 s 4.]